Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 2

Municipal Plan

13-4-201. General plan for physical development.

It is the function and duty of the commission to make and adopt an official general plan for the physical development of the municipality, including any area outside of its boundaries which, in the commission's judgment, bears relation to the planning of the municipality. The plan, with the accompanying maps, plats, charts, and descriptive and explanatory matter, shall show the commission's recommendations for the physical development of the area of the municipal planning jurisdiction and identify areas where there are inadequate or nonexistent publicly or privately owned and maintained services and facilities when the planning commission has determined the services are necessary in order for development to occur, and may include, among other things, the general location, character and extent of streets, bridges, viaducts, parks, parkways, waterways, waterfronts, playgrounds, airports and other public ways, grounds, places and spaces, the general location of public buildings and other public property, the general location and extent of public utilities and terminals, whether publicly or privately owned, for water, light, power, sanitation, transportation, communication and other purposes; also the removal, relocation, widening, extension, narrowing, vacating, abandonment, change of use or extension of any of the foregoing public ways, grounds, places, spaces, buildings, properties or utilities; also a zoning plan for the regulation of the height, area, bulk, location and use of private and public structures and premises and of population density; also the general location, character, layout and extent of community centers and neighborhood units; also the general location, character, extent and layout of the replanning of blighted districts and slum areas. The commission may from time to time amend, extend or add to the plan or carry any part of subject matter into greater detail.

Acts 1935, ch. 34, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-503; Acts 2008, ch. 1150, § 6.

Cross-References. Adoption of regional plan before municipality affected, § 13-3-301.

Adoption of regional plan upon certification, § 13-3-304.

Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

Zoning regulations in metropolitan governments, § 7-3-304.

13-4-202. Adoption of plan — Manner.

The commission may adopt the plan as a whole by a single resolution, or, as the work of making the whole plan progresses, may from time to time adopt a part or parts thereof, any such part to correspond generally with one (1) or more of the functional subdivisions of the subject matter of the plan. Prior to the adoption of the plan or any part or parts of the plan by the commission, the commission shall hold a public hearing thereon, the time and place of which shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality at least thirty (30) days prior to the meeting in which the adoption is to be first considered. The adoption of the plan or any part, amendment or addition shall be by resolution carried by the affirmative votes of not less than a majority of all the members of the commission. The resolution shall refer expressly to the maps, descriptive matter and other matters intended by the commission to form the whole or part of the plan, and the action taken shall be recorded on the adopted plan or part thereof and descriptive matter by the identifying signature of the secretary of the commission, and a copy of the plan or part thereof shall be certified to the chief legislative body.

Once the commission has adopted the general plan or amendment of the general plan for the planning jurisdiction of the commission, the commission's transmittal of the certification to the legislative body may simultaneously include a resolution by the planning commission requesting the consideration and adoption of the general plan by the legislative body of the municipality and in the case of a municipal regional planning commission by the county legislative body for the area outside the municipal boundary limits but within the county. The municipal legislative body, by ordinance, may adopt the general plan as certified by the planning commission and the county legislative body by resolution may adopt the elements of the plan within the jurisdiction of the county legislative body as certified by the planning commission. Once adopted by the legislative body, the general regional plan may be amended by a vote as follows:

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(1)(B), the planning commission may initiate an amendment to the general plan. If the planning commission votes to adopt an amendment to the general plan, the planning commission shall transmit its action to the legislative body and the legislative body must pass the amendment by a majority vote in order for the amendment to be operative;

If the planning commission initiates and votes to adopt an amendment to the general plan, the amendment shall be operative without further action of the legislative body. The planning commission shall transmit its action to the legislative body;

Subdivision (b)(1)(B)(i) shall only apply in any county having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

7,200 7,300

7,975 8,025

12,800 12,900

17,400 17,450

17,700 17,775

20,300 20,400

88,800 88,900

The general regional plan may be amended upon the initiative of the legislative body. The initiative must be transmitted, in writing, to the planning commission for its review, consideration and vote. The planning commission must take action on the amendment and transmit its action to the legislative body within sixty-one (61) days of the submittal of the amendment to the planning commission by the legislative body;

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(C), if the planning commission votes to approve or not approve the amendment or transmits the amendment back to the legislative body with no recommendation, the legislative body must then approve the amendment by a majority vote;

not less than nor more than

7,200 7,300

7,975 8,025

12,800 12,900

17,400 17,450

17,700 17,775

20,300 20,400

88,800 88,900

If the municipal planning commission created by a municipality votes to approve the amendment, the amendment shall be operative without further action of the legislative body. If the municipal planning commission votes to not approve the amendment or to make no recommendation on the amendment, the amendment shall not be operative. The municipal planning commission shall transmit its action back to the legislative body and provide a written explanation for its reasons in not approving the amendment or for not making a recommendation on the initiative transmitted to the commission by the legislative body;

Subdivision (b)(2)(C)(i) shall only apply to a municipality located in any county having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

Prior to the adoption of the general plan or amendment of the general plan, a legislative body shall hold a public hearing thereon, the time and place of which shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality at least thirty (30) days prior to the legislative body's meeting in which the adoption or amendment is to be first considered. After the adoption of the general plan by a legislative body, any land use decisions thereafter made by that legislative body, the respective planning commission or board of zoning appeals when the board of zoning appeals is exercising its powers on matters other than variances, must be consistent with the plan. The general plan may be adopted as an element of the jurisdiction's growth plan through the process established in title 6, chapter 58, but if the general plan is not adopted as part of the growth plan, it nevertheless cannot be inconsistent with the growth plan or the intent of title 6, chapter 58.

Acts 1935, ch. 34, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-504; Acts 2008, ch. 1150, §§ 7, 8; 2010, ch. 648, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-4-203. General purposes of the plan — Surveys and studies.

In the preparation of the plan, the commission shall make careful and comprehensive surveys and studies of the existing conditions and future growth of the municipality and its environs. The plan shall be made with the general purpose of guiding and accomplishing a coordinated, adjusted and harmonious development of the municipality which will, in accordance with existing and future needs, best promote public health, safety, morals, order, convenience, prosperity and the general welfare, as well as efficiency and economy in the process of development, and identify areas where there are inadequate or nonexistent publicly or privately owned and maintained services and facilities when the planning commission has determined the services are necessary in order for development to occur.

Acts 1935, ch. 34, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-505; Acts 2008, ch. 1150, § 9.